Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.090

Research, promotional, and educational campaigns.

The commission shall create, provide for, and conduct a research, promotional, and educational campaign as sales and market conditions reasonably require. It shall investigate and ascertain the needs of producers, conditions of markets, and degree of public awareness of products, and take into account the information obtained in the discharge of its duties under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 314 s 9.]